Mississippi statutes. Title 59. Ports, Harbors, Landings and Watercraft
Article 5. Supplemental and Additional Powers.

§ 59-7-201.
Application and construction of article.

This article shall be applicable to all counties electing to come under the terms and provisions of Article 3 of this chapter and in which a flood control project has been authorized or may be authorized by the federal government which either directly or indirectly involves, or has the result of creating, a potential industrial area or the protection of such an area. This article is supplementary to said Article 3 of this chapter, and all other laws of this state concerning ports and harbors and shall not be construed by way of limitation on any of the powers or authority heretofore granted, but the authority conferred herein is in addition and cumulative thereto.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7576-21; Laws, 1956, ch. 183, § 1.

§ 59-7-203.
Acquisition of lands after giving of assurances required by federal authorities.

Where any county in connection with any such flood control project has given or may give assurances of local cooperation required by the federal authorities, as authorized by law, the board of supervisors of such county shall have the added power and authority, if necessary or desirable for the fulfillment of such assurances, to acquire all lands and easements and rights-of-way, and the fee title to such lands where advisable, either by purchase or by condemnation and, if by condemnation, according to the existing statutes applicable to the acquisition by counties of property for public use.

Where any county of the state which operates any such project has been required to give its assurances by the federal authorities or other agency of the government of the United States of local cooperation and participation in any such project by agreeing to pay any part of the construction costs of such project or projects, then the board of supervisors of such county shall have the added power and authority, if necessary and desirable for the fulfillment of such assurances, to sign agreements with such federal authorities or other agency of the government of the United States whereby such participating county agrees to pay its part of the cost of such construction or any fractional part thereof, including interest of not more than three per cent (3%) per annum, and provided further that said assurances shall be due and payable within the primary term of forty years from the time such assurances are given.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7576-22; Laws, 1956, ch. 183, § 2; Laws, 1962, ch. 392, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 22, 1962).

§ 59-7-205.
General duties and powers of port commission.

In any county where a port commission has been established or may be established and where the board of supervisors of said county directs that said commission undertake, on behalf of such county, jurisdiction over and duties in connection with the fulfillment of the assurances of local cooperation and handling of the harbor project upon which construction may be done by the federal government, as contemplated by Section 59-7-201, and where either all or over half of the lands and properties involved in said project are beyond the confines of any municipality lying within said county, then the board of supervisors of said county shall appoint four (4) members of said port commission in accordance with the terms and provisions of Section 59-7-125, and, where such port commission has been established or may be established in such instance, then said port commission shall undertake and perform the duties assigned to it by said board, as hereby authorized, and said commissions shall, in addition, manage and control all port facilities which may be authorized and constructed by virtue of the terms and provisions of Article 3 of this chapter, and all appurtenant and physical properties connected therewith, both real and personal, and shall provide for the regular inspection, repair, maintenance and improvement of said port facilitates. Said port commission, in the performance of its duties, may make any contract and authorize any purchases from any funds on hand in the port fund of any such county, which said contracts and purchases shall be made in accordance with Section 31-7-1 et seq. Said contracts and purchases shall include all contracts and purchases incidental to or necessary for the proper establishment, insurance, maintenance, repair, improvement and operation of said port facilities, including, if indicated for their protection, workmen’s compensation insurance for the benefit of any employees of said port commission.

Any such port commission is further authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to own and operate any or all dock, terminal, warehouse or railroad facilities which may by it be deemed necessary or desirable to promote the development of any port or industrial facilities under its control or supervision and to such end such port commission is authorized and empowered to acquire by purchase, construction or lease any buildings, structure or equipment, to employ any personnel or technical assistance, to enter into any contracts with any persons, firms or corporations, and to establish, charge and collect any tariffs, rates or other charges in connection therewith, as may be deemed necessary or advisable to accomplish such purposes. Said port commission is likewise authorized and empowered to operate such dock, terminal, warehouse or railroad facilities through agents or lessees by such contractual or lease agreements as may be entered into by said port commission upon such terms and conditions as said commission may deem proper. The authority granted hereby shall extend only to the lands under the control and supervision of said port commission.

The powers and authority granted by this section are supplemental to all other powers and authority granted to said port commission and the same shall in nowise be construed to limit any such powers and authority heretofore granted.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7576-23; Laws, 1956, ch. 183, § 3; Laws, 1963, 1st Ex. Sess. ch. 31, §§ 1-3; Laws, 1980, ch. 440, § 24, eff from and after January 1, 1981.

§ 59-7-207.
Operation of port facilities; employment of personnel.

The commission referred to in Section 59-7-205 may establish and operate said port facilities on such plan as it may determine upon, including the right to employ, or delegate to the port director the employment of such engineering and legal assistants and such subordinate personnel as the commission may deem necessary, to provide for the wages and compensation of the port director and all other employees; and, in their discretion, to require that the port director and such other subordinate personnel as may be deemed necessary and desirable post a bond written by a surety company or companies authorized to do business in the State of Mississippi in such amount as the commission may designate, conditioned on the faithful discharge of all of their duties as such employees, the premiums on such bonds to be paid from said port fund in the discretion of the commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7576-24; Laws, 1956, ch. 183, § 4.

§ 59-7-209.
Delegation of additional duties, powers and rights to commission; approval of acts and expenditures of commission; liability of commissioners and counties.

The board of supervisors of any such county described in Section 59-7-201 may prescribe such further duties, powers and rights of such commission as may be within the authority of such board to delegate and provide for the reasonable compensation, if any, of the chairman and members of the commission, and shall provide that the acts of such commissioners shall regularly, and not less than quarterly or more than monthly, be reported to said board and be subject to its approval and concurrence by order spread upon the minutes of said board generally approving such reports and minutes. The obligations incurred and the expenditures authorized to be made by said commission shall in the manner herein set forth be subject to the approval of the board of supervisors of said county; and when and should the board decline to grant its approval of any act of said commission, it shall signify its reason for withholding that approval on the minutes of said board. All expenditures so authorized and provided for shall be made upon special port commission warrants to be countersigned by the clerk of said board. There shall be no personal obligation or liability on the part of any member of said commission except for a wilful wrong, nor shall there be any general obligation or liability on said county other than from the revenues derived from the operation of said port and revenues allocated by law to the aforesaid port fund of said county, except for the obligation of a condemnation award or for any such obligation which may be provided for in any trust indenture or resolution under which bonds are issued under the terms and provisions of Article 3 of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7576-26; Laws, 1956, ch. 183, § 6.

§ 59-7-211.
Sale, lease or conveyance of lands or easements.

In all such counties, described in Section 59-7-201, upon and with the approval of the board of supervisors, the port commission shall have the power and authority to sell or lease any lands or easements acquired by any such county in conjunction with the establishment and construction of any port or harbor under the jurisdiction of said commission for the purposes of industrial development, but the terms and provisions of any such sales or lease shall include limitations as to the use of such lands and easements for industrial activities integrated to water transportation in accordance with the terms and provisions of such assurances of local cooperation as may have been given by virtue of Section 51-35-15 or Section 51-35-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, and the provisions of this article. Furthermore, said port commission, upon and with the approval of the board of supervisors, shall have the power and is hereby authorized, in its discretion, to sell and convey to the United States of America, without any limitations whatsoever, by general or special warranty deed or other acceptable form or conveyance, the full title to any lands acquired or held by any such county in connection with the establishment and development of any harbor or port project under the jurisdiction of said commission in exchange for the title to lands of the United States of America deemed useful for or needed by any county in connection with the establishment, enlargement, development, construction or maintenance of any port or harbor project under the jurisdiction of said commission, or for such other consideration as said commission and said board find to be adequate and sufficient. Said port commission, upon and with the approval of the board of supervisors of the county, is further hereby authorized to donate and/or sell and convey, without any limitations, upon such terms and conditions as may be deemed proper by the said commission and said board of supervisors, to the United States of America any of the lands needed by the United States of America for navigation and/or flood control purposes, or in fulfillment of any authorized assurances which have been given or which may be given by said county to the United States of America, or for the purpose of the display of the Gunboat Cairo.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7576-27; Laws, 1956, ch. 183, § 7; Laws, 1964, ch. 467; Laws, 1966, ch. 275, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved June 16, 1966).

§ 59-7-213.
Maintenance of records by commission; public inspection of records.

The port commission shall keep regular minutes of all its official actions and shall provide for an adequate bookkeeping system and regular audits and keep or cause to be kept full and correct records of the finances of said port commission and shall, from said port funds, provide for, and pay to the clerk of said board fees and sums as are found to be proper and reasonable for the extra duties and work hereby imposed upon him. All such minutes, books and records shall be kept in the office of the chancery clerk of the county in which the port is located or in such other place as the board of supervisors may designate by order spread upon their minutes to the end that such minutes, books and records shall, under reasonable conditions, be available at all times to the public for inspection.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7576-25; Laws, 1956, ch. 183, § 5.